src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM
+N+Prop+Sem/Patr+Sem/Fem: N_КУДО-Derivation ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Patr+Sem/Fem: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Patr+Sem/Fem: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Patr+Sem/Fem: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX ;

!! DECLENSION LIMITATIONS

LEXICON PROP_КУДО-PL
+N+Prop: NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
+N+Prop: _КУДО-Indef-Declension ;
+N+Prop: N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SUB
+Err/Orth: PROP_КУДО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SH
+Use/Short: PROP_КУДО ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
